Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1117
Petition; where filed; contents; evidentiary rules; applicability.

The Attorney General or county attorney may file a petition in the district court of the county in which a subject resides or the county in which an alleged act constituting a threat of harm to others occurs. The petition shall allege that the subject is a person in need of court-ordered custody and treatment and shall contain the following:

(1) The name and address of the subject, if known;

(2) A statement that the subject is believed to be eighteen years of age or older or that the subject is a juvenile who will become eighteen years of age within ninety days after the date of filing the petition;

(3) The name and address of the subject's guardian or closest relative, if known;

(4) The name and address of any other person having custody and control of the subject, if known;

(5) A statement that the subject has a developmental disability and poses a threat of harm to others;

(6) The factual basis to support the allegation that the subject has a developmental disability; and

(7) The factual basis to support the allegation that the subject poses a threat of harm to others.

The Nebraska Evidence Rules shall apply to proceedings under the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act unless otherwise specified.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 17.

Nebraska Evidence Rules, see section 27-1103.